src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_UKSI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_UKSI-SG ;
LEXICON N_UKSI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_UKSI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUARI !!≈ @CODE@ suari:suar
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} N_SUARI/KIELI_01 ;
LEXICON N_SUARI-PL !!≈ @CODE@ suari:suar
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} N_SUARI/KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI_01 !!≈ @CODE@ kieli:kiel
!! Gradation No
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUARI/KIELI-SG ;
 N_SUARI/KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI-SG
:%{front%} 	NMN_SUARI/KIELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI-PL
:%{front%} 	NMN_SUARI/KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_KIELI !!≈ @CODE@ kieli:kiel
!! Harmony: Front
 N_KIELI-SG ;
 N_KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_KIELI-SG !!≈ @CODE@ kieli:kiel
:%{front%} NMN_KIELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_KIELI-PL !!≈ @CODE@ kieli:kiel
!! Harmony: Front
:%{front%} NMN_KIELI-PL ;



LEXICON N_LAPSI !!≈ @CODE@ lapsi:laps lapsi:laps
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_LAPSI-SG  ;
        N_LAPSI-PL  ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_LAPSI-SG ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_LAPSI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VEZI !!≈ @CODE@ vezi:ved
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^D2Z%>i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_VEZI-SG ;
 N_VEZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VEZI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-SG ;

LEXICON N_VEZI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUZI !!≈ @CODE@ suzi:su
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:zi ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUZI-SG ;
 N_SUZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUZI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SUZI-SG ;

LEXICON N_SUZI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SUZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VUOZI !!≈ @CODE@ vuozi:vuod
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^D2Z%>i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_VUOZI-SG        ;
 N_VUOZI-PL        ;

LEXICON N_VUOZI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-SG	;
LEXICON N_VUOZI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-PL	;

!! ### THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON N_SYGYZY !!≈ @CODE@ sygyzy:sygyzy
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SYGYZY-SG ;
        N_SYGYZY-PL ;

LEXICON N_SYGYZY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_SYGYZY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_SYGYZY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_SYGYZY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_VASKIČČU !!≈ @CODE@ vaskičču:vaskičča
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_VASKIČČU-SG ;
        N_VASKIČČU-PL ;

LEXICON N_VASKIČČU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VASKIČČU-SG        ;

LEXICON N_VASKIČČU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VASKIČČU-PL        ;

!! ### THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
LEXICON N_KARJAL !!≈ @CODE@ karjal:karjal
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_KARJAL-SG ;
	N_KARJAL-PL ;
LEXICON N_KARJAL-SG !!≈ @CODE@ karjal:karjal
:	NMN_KARJAL-SG ;
LEXICON N_KARJAL-PL !!≈ @CODE@ karjal:karjal
:	NMN_KARJAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_MADAL !!≈ @CODE@ madal:madal
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_MADAL-SG ;
	N_MADAL-PL ;
LEXICON N_MADAL-SG !!≈ @CODE@ madal:madal
:	NMN_MADAL-SG ;
LEXICON N_MADAL-PL !!≈ @CODE@ madal:madal
:	NMN_MADAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_PIIRAI !!≈ @CODE@ piirai:piira CHECK THIS
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_PIIRAI-SG ;
        N_PIIRAI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PIIRAI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-SG ;

LEXICON N_PIIRAI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VERÄI !!≈ @CODE@ veräi:verä CHECK THIS
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_VERÄI-SG ;
        N_VERÄI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VERÄI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-SG ;

LEXICON N_VERÄI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-PL ;


LEXICON N_KANDAI !!≈ @CODE@ kandai:kanda
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_KANDAI-SG ;
        N_KANDAI-PL ;

LEXICON N_KANDAI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KANDAI-SG ;

LEXICON N_KANDAI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KANDAI-PL ;

LEXICON  N_AVUAJU !!≈ @CODE@ 
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!!!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%}a NMN_AVUAJU/KERIÄJY ;

LEXICON  N_KERIÄJY !!≈ @CODE@ piästäjy:piästä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
:%{front%}%>%{ijPRC%}ä NMN_AVUAJU/KERIÄJY ;


LEXICON N_PAGIZII !!≈ @CODE@ pagizii:pagizi
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_PAGIZII-SG ;
 N_PAGIZII-PL ;
LEXICON N_PAGIZII-SG !!≈ @CODE@ 
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PAGIZII-SG ;
LEXICON N_PAGIZII-PL !!≈ @CODE@ 
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PAGIZII-PL ;

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI !!≈ @CODE@ huoletoi: huolet
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_HUOLETOI-SG ;
 N_HUOLETOI-PL ;

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI-SG ;

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI-PL ;


LEXICON N_SAMMAL !!≈ @CODE@ sammal:sammal
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SAMMAL-SG ;
 N_SAMMAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_SAMMAL-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMAL-SG ;

LEXICON N_SAMMAL-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMAL-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TVER !!≈ @CODE@ tver:tver
! N_TVER-SG ;
! N_TVER-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TVER-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_TVER-SG ;

!LEXICON N_TVER-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_TVER-PL ;

LEXICON N_ŠOUFER !!≈ @CODE@ šoufer:šoufer
!! Vowel Harmony: Back
 N_ŠOUFER-SG ;
 N_ŠOUFER-PL ;

LEXICON N_ŠOUFER-SG
:%{back%} NMN_ŠOUFER-SG ;

LEXICON N_ŠOUFER-PL
:%{back%} NMN_ŠOUFER-PL ;

LEXICON N_VANUIN !!≈ @CODE@ vanuin:vanui
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! Stem	     consonant n/m
!! Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
!! Plural stem vowel i
!:n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_VANUIN-SG ;
 N_VANUIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_VANUIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VANUIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_VANUIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VANUIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN !!≈ @CODE@ sammutin:sammutti
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! Stem consonant n/m
!! Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
!! Plural stem vowel i
!:%^WGStem%>n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SAMMUTIN-SG ;
 N_SAMMUTIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEITIN !!≈ @CODE@ keitin:keitti
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!! Stem consonant n/m
!! Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
!! Plural stem vowel i
!:%^WGStem%>n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KEITIN-SG ;
 N_KEITIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEITIN-SG
:%{front%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_KEITIN-PL
:%{front%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_LÄMMIN !!≈ @CODE@ lämmin:lämbi
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^WGStem%>n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_LÄMMIN-SG ;
 N_LÄMMIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_LÄMMIN-SG
:%{front%} NMN_LÄMMIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_LÄMMIN-PL
:%{front%} NMN_LÄMMIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_TAIGIN !!≈ @CODE@ taigin:taigin
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_TAIGIN-SG ;
 N_TAIGIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_TAIGIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TAIGIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_TAIGIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TAIGIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
+Cmp/Sh:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KARJALAINE-SG     ;
 N_KARJALAINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-SG	 ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-PL	 ;

LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE !!≈ @CODE@ liygiläine:liygilä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
+Cmp/Sh:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_LIYGILÄINE-SG     ;
 N_LIYGILÄINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-SG	 ;

LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-PL	 ;

LEXICON N_NAINE !!≈ @CODE@ naine:nai
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
+Cmp/Sh:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_NAINE-SG     ;
 N_NAINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_NAINE-SG
:%{back%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-SG         ;
LEXICON N_NAINE-PL
:%{back%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-PL         ;

LEXICON N_KIELINE !!≈ @CODE@ kieline:kieli
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
+Cmp/Sh:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KIELINE-SG     ;
 N_KIELINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_KIELINE-SG
:%{front%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-SG         ;
LEXICON N_KIELINE-PL
:%{front%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-PL         ;

LEXICON N_TOINE !!≈ @CODE@ toine:to
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!+Cmp/Sh:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_TOINE-SG     ;
 N_TOINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_TOINE-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE-SG         ;

LEXICON N_TOINE-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE-PL         ;



LEXICON N_RAIŠ !!≈ @CODE@ raiš:ra
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
	N_RAIŠ-SG	;
	N_RAIŠ-PL	;
