src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
aiduveräi+N:aidu#verä N_VERÄI  "aidan veräjä" ;
ajotulet+N:ajo#tule N_SUARI-PL  "ajovalot" ;
alatuuli+N:ala#tuul N_SUARI  "tuiskutuuli" ;
askel+N:askel N_SAMMAL  "askel" ;
borkan+N:borkan N_TAIGIN  "ulpukka" ;
hallonhalguaju+N:hallon#halguaja N_AVUAJU  "halonhakkaaja" ;
heläitin+N:heläitti N_KEITIN  "tamburiini" ;
hienotavar+N:hieno#tavar N_TAIGIN  "asusteet: lyhyttavarat" ;
huarottamine+N:huarottami N_NAINE  "levittäminen" ;
humalasolii+N:humalasoli N_PAGIZII  "juopunut" ;
huramieli+N:hura#miel N_KIELI  "ennakkoaavistus" ;
hyvyöntahtoi+N:hyvyön#tahto N_KANDAI  "hyväntahtoja" ;
höyrykeitin+N:höyrykeitti N_KEITIN  "höyrykeitin" ;
igenitöi-ägenitöi+N:igenit-ägenit N_HUOLETOI  "etana-etana" ;
ičenpuolistamine+N:ičenpuolistami N_KIELINE  "itsepuolustus" ;
jalguin+N:jalgui N_VANUIN  "jalustin" ;
jalgumiäččyhkižuaju+N:jalgu#miäččyh#kižuaja N_AVUAJU  "jalkapalloilija" ;
juotin+N:juotti N_SAMMUTIN  "juotin" ;
jägäl+N:jägäl N_MADAL  "jäkälä" ;
jällenvedäi+N:jällen#vedä N_KERIÄJY  "seuraaja" ;
kaksožet+N:kakso N_NAINE-PL  "kaksoset" ;
kalanmaimaine+N:kalan#maima N_KARJALAINE  "kalanpoika(nen)" ;
kazvandahine+N:kazvandahi N_NAINE  "kasvain" ;
kaččiezet+N:kaččie N_NAINE-PL  "katsojaiset" ;
keitinpiirai+N:keitin#piira N_PIIRAI  "keitinpiiras" ;
keriččimet+N:keričči N_VANUIN-PL  "keritsimet" ;
kidžerät+N:kidžer N_KARJAL-PL  "kiharat" ;
kielastai+N:kielastai N_KANDAI  "valehtelija" ;
kieli+N:kiel N_KIELI  "kieli" ;
kiidžin+N:kiidži N_VANUIN  "vesisammal" ;
kinnermägiläine+N:kinnermägilä N_LIYGILÄINE  "kinnermäkeläinen" ;
kirjuttelii+N:kirjutteli N_PAGIZII  "laskija" ;
kolmekulmuviivatin+N:kolme#kulmu#viivatti N_SAMMUTIN  "kolmioviivain" ;
koufeinkeitin+N:koufein#keitti N_SAMMUTIN  "kahvinkeitin" ;
koufienkeitin+N:koufienkeitti N_KEITIN  "kahvinkeitin" ;
kuoret+N:kuor N_KIELI-PL  "kuoret" ;
kynzi+N:kynd N_VEZI  "kynsi" ;
kytkin+N:kytki N_LÄMMIN  "kytkin" ;
käskylöičysvuozi+N:käskylöičys#vuod N_VUOZI  "palvelusvuosi" ;
lapset+N:laps N_KIELI-PL  "lapset" ;
lapsi+N:laps N_LAPSI  "lapsi" ;
luistimet+N:luisti N_VANUIN-PL  "luistimet" ;
lämmin+N:lämmin N_LÄMMIN  "lämpö" ;
läžimine+N:läžimi N_KIELINE  "sairastaminen" ;
madal+N:madal N_MADAL  "matala" ;
muahpanijazet+N:muahpanija N_KARJALAINE-PL  "hautajaiset" ;
muurai+N:muura N_PIIRAI  "muurain" ;
neičykkäine+N:neičykkä N_LIYGILÄINE  "tyttö" ;
niittäi+N:niittä N_KERIÄJY "niittäjä" ;
nänniniekkulapsi+N:nänniniekku#laps N_LAPSI  "rintalapsi" ;
ojaine+N:oja N_KARJALAINE  "(luonnon)oja" ;
omahižet+N:omahi N_KARJALAINE-PL  "omaiset" ;
opastusvuozi+N:opastus#vuod N_VUOZI  "opetusvuosi" ;
oravankynzi+N:oravan#kynd N_VEZI  "kissankynsi" ;
ottolapsi+N:otto#laps N_LAPSI  "ottolapsi" ;
pagin+N:pagin N_TAIGIN  "puhe" ;
porʼatkanpidäi+N:porʼatkanpidä N_KANDAI  "järjestysmies" ;
pygäl+N:pygäl N_MADAL  "pykälä" ;
pälläine+N:pällä N_LIYGILÄINE  "nieriä" ;
ruadovuozi+N:ruado#vuod N_VUOZI  "työvuosi" ;
ruissieni+N:ruis#sien N_KIELI  "rousku" ;
ruohtimet+N:ruohti N_VANUIN-PL  "rohtimet" ;
sana-toine+N:sana-to N_TOINE  "jokunen sana" ;
semmoine+N:semmo N_TOINE  "sellainen" ;
silminnägii+N:silmin#nägi N_PAGIZII  "silminnäkijä" ;
silmätöi+N:silmätöi N_HUOLETOI  "silmäpuoli" ;
su+N:suze N_SUZI  "susi (sananparsissa ym.)" ;
suappai+N:suappai N_PIIRAI  "saapas" ;
suonet+N:suonet N_KIELI-PL  "sisälmykset" ;
suulagi+N:suu#lagi N_RAIŠ  "suulaki" ;
suulagi+N:suulagi N_RAIŠ  "suulaki" ;
suzi+N:suze N_SUZI  "susi (sananparsissa ym., tav. hukka, suzi:suzen:suttu)" ;
sygyzy+N:sygyzy N_SYGYZY  "syksy" ;
syömižet+N:syömi N_KIELINE-PL  "ruuat" ;
tagaveräi+N:taga#verä N_VERÄI  "takaovi" ;
tallustin+N:tallusti N_VANUIN  "pohjallinen" ;
tiheikkö+N:tiheikkö N_SYGYZY  "tiheikkö" ;
tiluaju+N:tilua N_AVUAJU  "tilaaja" ;
tinakynzi+N:tina#kynd N_VEZI  "saituri" ;
tyttöine+N:tyttö N_KARJALAINE  "tyttö" ;
vaskičču+N:vaskičča N_VASKIČČU  "vaskitsa" ;
veriät+N:verä N_PIIRAI-PL  "ulko-ovet" ;
voimatoi+N:voimat N_HUOLETOI  "sairas" ;
vuozikymmen+N:vuozi#kymmen N_SAMMAL  "vuosikymmen" ;
äijäntiedäi+N:äijän#tiedä N_KERIÄJY  "tietomies" ;
šoufer+N:šoufer N_ŠOUFER  "kuljettaja" ;
